Washington statutes.
RCW 6.15.040

Separate property of spouse exempt.

All real and personal property belonging to any married person at the time of his or her marriage, and all which he or she may have acquired subsequently to such marriage, or to which he or she shall hereafter become entitled in his or her own right, and all his or her personal earnings, and all the issues, rents and profits of such real property, shall be exempt from execution, attachment, and garnishment upon any liability or judgment against the other spouse, so long as he or she or any minor heir of his or her body shall be living: PROVIDED, That the separate property of each spouse shall be liable for debts owing by him or her at the time of marriage.

[ 1987 c 442 s 304; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 14; Code 1881 s 341; 1877 p 71 s 345; 1869 p 85 s 337; 1854 p 178 s 252; RRS s 570. Formerly RCW 6.16.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Exemption of nonobligated spouse or domestic partner's earnings from satisfaction of other spouse or domestic partner's child support obligations: RCW 26.16.200.